District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.41

Rulemaking.

(a)

The Mayor may issue rules to implement the requirements of this part.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 461, 55 DCR 1689
Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-192, § 2(i), 59 DCR 10174
This section is referenced in § 2-1226.35.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-192 rewrote (a); and repealed (b) and (c).

D.C. Law 17-53, § 501, added a section to read as follows:

“Sec. 501. Eminent domain.

“(a) The repeal of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation Act of 1998, effective September 11, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-144; D.C. Official Code § 2-1219.01 et seq.) (’NCRC Act’), under section 103(a) shall not impair or affect the validity of the acquisition by the NCRC or the RLARC of any properties nor shall the repeal affect the authority under which properties were previously taken, or for which condemnation proceedings were initiated, under section 20 of the NCRC Act (D.C. Official Code § 2-1219.19).

“(b) Condemnation proceedings initiated by the NCRC or the RLARC under section 20 of the NCRC Act may be continued or reinstituted by the Mayor in the name of the District and the Mayor may rely upon the authority pursuant to which the NCRC or the RLARC acted as well as the findings previously made by the Council and by the NCRC or the RLARC in connection with the condemnation proceedings or the authority granted to the Mayor pursuant to D. C. Official Code § 16-1311.”

Section 702(b) of D.C. Law 17-53 provides that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 501 of National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-71, July 20, 2007, 54 DCR 7390).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 501 of National Capitol Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-152, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10900).
Delegation of Authority—Anacostia River Clean Up and Protection Act of 2009, see Mayor’s Order 2010-27, February 12, 2010 ( 57 DCR 1377).